Utah statutes.
62A-1-109.   Division directors -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Qualifications.

The chief officer of each division and office enumerated in Section 62A-1-105 shall be a director who shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the division or office.  Each division director shall be appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the division's board.  The director of any division may be removed from that position at the will of the executive director after consultation with that division's board.  Each office director shall be appointed by the executive director.  Directors of divisions and offices shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19.  The director of each division and office shall be experienced in administration and possess such additional qualifications as determined by the executive director, and as provided by law.

